Hawaii statutes.
§453-32.6 Delegation to committee of
practicing emergency physicians or osteopathic physicians and emergency
ambulance personnel. The Hawaii medical board shall establish a committee
consisting of practicing emergency physicians or osteopathic physicians and
emergency ambulance personnel to assist the board in the performance of duties
under this part.

The board, by written order, may delegate to
the committee any of its powers and duties for administration of this part,
except that the board shall not delegate any authority to adopt, amend, or
repeal rules, take disciplinary action against a certificate holder, or restore
a certificate which has been revoked. [L 1984, c 168, pt of §2; am L 2008, c 5,
§20 and c 9, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next